Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 2. Limitations

38-39-201.
Liens not to run over fifteen years.

Except as provided in sections 38-39-202 and 38-39-204, any lien upon property created by a mortgage or deed of trust shall cease to be a lien fifteen years after the date on which the final payment or performance of the obligation secured thereby is due as shown by such mortgage or deed of trust recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein the property is located.

If the date on which the final payment or performance is due cannot be determined from the information contained in the recorded mortgage or deed of trust, such date shall, for the purpose of this article, be considered to be the date of the recorded instrument or, if the instrument is undated, the date the instrument was first recorded, notwithstanding anything in any other instrument or any unrecorded instrument to the contrary.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1677, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former §§ 38-40-101 and 38-40-106, as they existed prior to 1990.

38-39-202.
Lien extended - method.

The lien of a recorded mortgage or deed of trust may be extended without the written agreement of the owner of the property encumbered by such lien by an instrument in writing, signed by the owner of the obligation secured by such lien or by the person, firm, or corporation designated in such mortgage or deed of trust as the trustee for the owner of the obligation, such as a note or bond secured by such lien or by the successor in office of such named trustee. Such instrument shall clearly describe the mortgage or deed of trust, shall state the date to which the lien has been extended, and shall be recorded before the expiration of the fifteen-year period described in section 38-39-201 (1) in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein the property is located. The date to which such lien is extended by such instrument shall in no event be later than fifteen years after the recording date of such instrument.

Additional and further extensions may be recorded from time to time in accordance with the provisions of this section in order to extend the lien of such mortgage or deed of trust. The original extension and all additional and further extensions shall, in no event, extend the lien of the original mortgage or trust deed beyond a total of thirty years without the written agreement of the owner of the property encumbered by such lien. Each successive extension must be recorded during the time that such mortgage or deed of trust constitutes a lien under the terms of this article and before the expiration of the respective period for which the lien of such mortgage or deed of trust may have been extended in accordance with the terms of this article.

The lien of a recorded mortgage or deed of trust may be extended for so long as agreed, by an instrument in writing, signed by the owner of the obligation secured by such lien and the owner of the property encumbered by such lien and recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such property is located.

The term “thirty years”, as used in this section, means thirty years after the original maturity date of such mortgage or deed of trust.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1677, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-40-102, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-39-203.
No release necessary.

No release or other instrument shall be necessary to discharge the lien of any recorded mortgage or deed of trust which has expired or ceased to be a lien as provided in sections 38-39-201 and 38-39-202, but nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting or preventing the execution of a release at any time.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1678, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-40-104, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-39-204.
Effect of notice of action on lien.

If, prior to the expiration of the period as defined in sections 38-39-201 and 38-39-202 during which any recorded mortgage or deed of trust constitutes a lien, there shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the proper county a notice of an action pending to foreclose such lien or a notice of election and demand for sale, the lien created by such instrument shall continue until final disposition of the action or foreclosure proceeding.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1678, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-40-110, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-39-205.
Action to be brought within fifteen years.

No action shall be commenced to foreclose the lien of any mortgage or deed of trust, unless such action is commenced prior to the date on which such mortgage or deed of trust ceases to be a lien pursuant to sections 38-39-201 and 38-39-202.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1677, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-40-105, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-39-206.
Does not extend any lien.

This article shall not be construed as extending any lien or the right to bring or maintain any action for which a shorter period may be provided by law.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1678, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-40-111, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-39-207.
Lien extinguished when action barred.

The lien created by any instrument shall be extinguished, regardless of any other provision in this article to the contrary, at the same time that the right to commence a suit to enforce payment of the indebtedness or performance of the obligation secured by the lien is barred by any statute of limitation of this state.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1678, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-40-112, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-39-208.
Action within seven years when in possession.

No action shall be commenced for any reason whatsoever to question or to set aside any foreclosure of any deed of trust, mortgage, or other lien, unless such action is commenced within seven years after the date of the vesting of title pursuant to such foreclosure.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1678, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-40-114, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-39-209.
Mortgages to United States.

Any mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument executed by a corporation organized under the provisions of articles 40, 55, and 56 of title 7, C.R.S., and given to secure any indebtedness to the United States, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, which affects real or personal property, or both, and which is recorded in the real property records in any county in which such property is located or is to be located shall have the same force and effect as if such instrument were also recorded, filed, or indexed as provided by law in the proper office in such county as a mortgage of personal property. All after-acquired real or personal property of such corporation, described or referred to as being mortgaged or pledged in any such instrument, shall become subject to the lien thereof immediately upon the acquisition of such property by such corporation, whether or not such property was in existence at the time of the execution of such instrument.

Recordation of any such instrument shall constitute notice and otherwise have the same effect with respect to such after-acquired property as it has under the laws relating to recordation with respect to property owned by such corporation at the time of the execution of such instrument and therein described or referred to as being mortgaged or pledged thereby. The lien upon personal property of any such instrument shall, after recordation thereof, continue in existence and of record until the performance of the obligation secured thereby or the release or satisfaction thereof by the owner thereof.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1678, § 3, effective October 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 546, § 13, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-40-115, as it existed prior to 1990.